Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.035

Surcharge by county legislative authority.

(1) A county legislative authority may impose a surcharge of up to ten dollars on each civil filing fee in district court and a surcharge of up to fifteen dollars on each filing fee for small claims actions for the purpose of funding dispute resolution centers established under this chapter.

(2) Any surcharge imposed shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the county treasurer for deposit in a separate account to be used solely for dispute resolution centers established under this chapter. Money received under this section is not subject to RCW 3.62.020(2) or 3.62.090. The accounts created pursuant to this subsection shall be audited by the state auditor in accordance with RCW 43.09.260.

[ 1990 c 172 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1990 c 172: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1990." [ 1990 c 172 s 4.]